Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1404
Initiative and referendum petitions; signers; requirements.

Initiative and referendum petition signers shall conform to the requirements of sections 32-629 and 32-630.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 386;

Laws 1995, LB 337, § 4;

Laws 1997, LB 460, § 7;

Laws 2003, LB 444, § 12;

Laws 2008, LB39, § 5;

Laws 2015, LB367, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB521, § 76.